District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

38-935

Exemption from District of Columbia taxes and assessments.

Repealed.

Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-170, § 10, 33 DCR 7188
Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 401(j), 45 DCR 1172
1981 Ed., § 31-2509.